Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3612
Board; vacancy; how filled.

Except for the position of the at-large member, whenever a vacancy occurs on the board for any reason, the Governor shall appoint an individual to fill such vacancy from the district in which the vacancy exists. If the vacant position is that of the at-large member, the appointment to fill such vacancy shall be made at large by the board.

Laws 1978, LB 639, § 12;

Laws 1992, LB 971, § 1.